Washington statutes.
RCW 19.192.010

Identification cards—Distinguishing official and not official proofs of identification—Penalties.

(1) Any person or entity, other than those listed in subsection (2) of this section, issuing an identification card that purports to identify the holder as a resident of this or any other state and that contains at least a name, photograph, and date of birth, must label the card "not official proof of identification" in fluorescent yellow ink, on the face of the card, and in not less than fourteen-point font. The background color of the card must be a color other than the color used for official Washington state driver's licenses and identicards.

(2) This section does not apply to the following persons and entities:

(a) Department of licensing;

(b) Any federal, state, or local government agency;

(c) The Washington *state liquor control board;

(d) Private employers issuing cards identifying employees;

(e) Banks and credit card companies issuing credit, debit, or bank cards containing a person's photograph; and

(f) Retail or wholesale stores issuing membership cards containing a person's photograph.

(3) Failure to comply with this section is a class 1 civil infraction.

[ 1998 c 24 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "state liquor control board" was renamed the "state liquor and cannabis board" by 2015 c 70 s 3.